California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) No state grant funds may be disbursed until the applicant agrees that any property acquired or developed with such funds shall be used by the applicant only for the purpose for which the funds were requested and that no other use of the property shall be permitted except by specific act of the Legislature.

(b) No state grant funds may be disbursed unless the applicant agrees to maintain and operate the property acquired or
 developed pursuant to this article for a period commensurate with the type of project and the proportion of state grant funds and local funds allocated to the capital costs of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.159.

Funds appropriated for local assistance grants pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5096.151 shall be encumbered by the recipient within three years of the date the appropriation became effective, regardless of the date when each project was approved pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5096.157.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 133, Sec. 1.   Effective June 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. State Park System [5096.161. - 5096.163.]

5096.161.

The Legislature recognizes that public financial resources are inadequate to meet all capital outlay needs of the state park system and that the development of recently acquired units of the state park system has proceeded at a rate that has prevented their full potential for public use from being realized. Accordingly, it is declared to be the policy of the state that funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5096.151 shall be appropriated primarily for projects that accomplish the following:

(a) Serve metropolitan population centers and accommodate day-use and weekend-overnight visits.

(b) Provide for the development of existing units with the minimum facilities necessary for accessibility, use, and interpretation.

(c) Rehabilitate facilities at existing units that will provide for more efficient management and reduced operational costs.

(d) Minimize dependence on motor vehicles and reduce other forms of energy and water consumption through appropriately designed facilities.

(e) Preserve examples of historical resources and natural landscapes that are underrepresented in the state park system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.162.

(a) Any Member of the Legislature, the State Park and Recreation Commission, the California Coastal Commission, or the Secretary of the Resources Agency may nominate any project to be funded under this article for study by the Department of Parks and Recreation. Any of the commissions shall make nominations by vote of its membership.

(b) The Department of Parks and Recreation shall study any project so nominated.

(c) Projects proposed for appropriation for the state park system pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5096.151 shall be subject to the favorable recommendation of the State Park and Recreation Commission.
 Projects recommended by the commission shall be forwarded to the Director of Finance for inclusion in the Budget Bill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 141.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, and approved in Prop. 1 on Nov. 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.163.

Acquisition for the state park system by purchase or by eminent domain shall be under the Property Acquisition Law (commencing with Section 15850 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Coastal Resources [5096.171. - 5096.178.]

5096.171.

Funds available pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5096.151 shall be expended pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.172.

(a) Any Member of the Legislature, the California Coastal Commission, the State Coastal Conservancy, the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, the State Park and Recreation Commission, or the Secretary of the Resources Agency may nominate, for study by the Department of Parks and Recreation, any project within the coastal zone for acquisition with funds made available for the state park system pursuant to category (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 5096.151. Any of the
 commissions, and the conservancy, shall make nominations by vote of its membership.

(b) The Department of Parks and Recreation shall study any project so nominated. In addition to the procedures required by Section 5006, the Department of Parks and Recreation shall submit to the Legislature annually a report consisting of a prioritized listing and comparative evaluation of all projects nominated for study, in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) March 1, 1981, for projects nominated prior to January 15, 1981.

(2) November 1, 1981, for projects nominated prior to June 30, 1981, and after January 15, 1981.

(3) November 1, 1982, and each November 1 thereafter for projects nominated during the 12 months ending June 30, 1982, and each June 30
 thereafter.

(c) In making the prioritized listing and comparative evaluation of potential acquisition sites, the department shall adhere to the following criteria and priorities:

(1) The first priority for the acquisition of coastal resources is as follows: 

(A) Land and water areas best suited to serve the recreational needs of urban populations.

(B) Land and water areas of significant environmental importance, such as habitat protection.

(2) The second priority for the acquisition of coastal resources is as follows:

(A) Land for physical and visual access to the coastline where public access opportunities are inadequate or
 could be impeded by incompatible uses.

(B) Remaining areas of high recreational value.

(C) Areas proposed as a coastal reserve or preserve, including areas that are or include restricted natural communities, including, but not limited to, ecological areas that are scarce, involving only a limited area; rare and endangered wildlife species habitat; rare and endangered plant species range; specialized wildlife habitat; outstanding representative natural communities; sites with outstanding educational value; fragile or environmentally sensitive resources; and wilderness or primitive areas. Areas meeting more than one of these criteria may be considered as especially important.

(D) Highly scenic areas that are or include landscape preservation projects; open areas identified as being of particular value in providing
 visual contrast to urbanization, in preserving natural landforms and significant vegetation, in providing attractive transitions between natural and urbanized areas, or as scenic open space; and scenic areas or historical districts designated by cities and counties within the coastal zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.173.

(a) The State Coastal Conservancy and the California Coastal Commission shall prepare and adopt priorities, criteria, and procedures for the disbursement and administration of grants of funds made available pursuant to category (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 5096.151 for the implementation of local coastal programs. The procedures shall include provisions that will serve as an incentive to local governments for timely submittal of their local coastal programs, in accordance with the requirements
 of the California Coastal Act of 1976 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000)).

(b) In consultation with the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, the State Coastal Conservancy shall prepare and adopt priorities, criteria, and procedures for the disbursement and administration of grants for the implementation of projects in San Francisco Bay.

(c) In consultation with the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, the State Coastal Conservancy shall prepare and adopt priorities, criteria, and procedures for the disbursement and administration of grants for the implementation of projects in the Santa Monica Mountains Zone.

(d) The procedures required by this section shall specify the categories of expenditures eligible for grants and shall include procedures for the submittal, review, and approval of
 applications and the disbursement of grant funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.174.

(a) An application for a grant shall be submitted to the State Coastal Conservancy for preliminary evaluation, review of adequacy, and classification as a park, beach, coastal access, or other project necessary to preserve coastal resource values.

(b) The minimum amount that may be applied for any individual project is one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c) Every application
 for a grant shall comply with the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.175.

(a) After completing the evaluation, review, and classification of an application, the State Coastal Conservancy shall forward the application to the California Coastal Commission for a determination as to its consistency with the approved land use plan of the applicable local coastal program or to the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission for a determination as to its consistency with the San Francisco Bay Plan or the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan.

(b) Applications which are determined by the California Coastal Commission to be consistent with the approved land use plan of the applicable local coastal program, or by the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission to be consistent with the bay or marsh plan, shall be returned to the State Coastal Conservancy for the purpose of disbursing grants consistent with priorities and criteria developed pursuant to Section 5096.173.

(c) Grants for projects in the Santa Monica Mountains Zone shall be disbursed consistent with the provisions of Division 23 (commencing with Section 33000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.176.

Funds granted pursuant to category (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 5096.151 may be expended for development, rehabilitation, or restoration only on lands owned by, or subject to a lease or other interest held by, the applicant city, county, or district. If such lands are not owned by the applicant, the applicant shall first demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Executive Officer of the State Coastal Conservancy that the development, rehabilitation, or restoration will provide benefits commensurate with the type and
 duration of interest in land held by the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.177.

No state grant funds may be disbursed until the applicant agrees that any property acquired or developed with such funds shall be used by the applicant only for the purpose for which the funds were requested and that no other use of the property shall be permitted except by specific act of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.178.

(a) An amount, not to exceed nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) in the aggregate, shall be available for appropriation during the 1980–81, 1981–82, and 1982–83 fiscal years, in amounts to be determined in each annual appropriation, from funds available pursuant to category (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 5096.151, in the manner provided in Section 5096.206, to the State Coastal Conservancy for expenditure for the administration of Sections 5096.173 to 5096.177, inclusive; provided, however,
 that not more than three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) may be appropriated in any one such fiscal year.

(b) An amount, not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) in the aggregate shall be available for appropriation commencing with the 1980–81 fiscal year from funds available pursuant to category (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 5096.151, in the manner provided in Section 5096.206, for projects in San Francisco Bay; and an amount, not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) in the aggregate, shall be available, for projects in the Santa Monica Mountains Zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous Provisions [5096.191. - 5096.197.]

5096.191.

Projects authorized for the purposes set forth in subdivision (b), category (1) of subdivision (c), and subdivision (d) of Section 5096.151 shall be subject to augmentation as provided in Section 16352 of the Government Code, as limited by any provision of the Budget Act. The unexpended balance in any appropriation made payable from the fund which the Director of Finance, with the approval of the State Public Works Board, determines not to be required for expenditure pursuant to the appropriation, may be transferred on
 order of the Director of Finance to, and in augmentation of, the appropriation made in Section 16352 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.192.

The Director of Parks and Recreation may make agreements with respect to any real property acquired pursuant to subdivision (b) and category (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 5096.151, and the Executive Officer of the State Coastal Conservancy may make agreements with respect to any real property acquired pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5096.151 for the continued tenancy of the seller of the property for a period of time and under such conditions as mutually agreed upon by the state and the seller so long as the
 seller promises to pay such taxes on his interest in the property as shall become due, owing, or unpaid on the interest created by such agreement, and so long as the seller conducts his operations on the land according to specifications issued by the appropriate director or officer to protect the property for the public use for which it was acquired. A copy of such agreement shall be filed with the county clerk in the county in which the property lies. Such arrangement shall be compatible with the operation of the area by the state, as determined by the appropriate director or officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.193.

All real property acquired pursuant to this chapter shall be acquired in compliance with the provisions of Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 7260) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. The Department of Parks and Recreation or the State Coastal Conservancy, as the case may be, shall prescribe procedures sufficient to assure such compliance by local public agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.194.

For the purposes of this chapter, acquisition may include gifts, purchases, leases, easements, the exercise of eminent domain if expressly authorized, the transfer or exchange of property for other property of like value, and purchases of development rights and other interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.195.

All grants, gifts, devises, or bequests to the state, conditional or unconditional, for park, conservation, recreation, or other purposes for which real property may be acquired or developed pursuant to this chapter, may be accepted and received on behalf of the state by the appropriate departmental director with the approval of the Director of Finance. Such grants, gifts, devises, or bequests shall be available, when appropriated by the Legislature, for expenditure for the purposes specified in Section
 5096.151.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.196.

Real property acquired by the state shall consist predominantly of open or natural lands, including lands under water capable of being utilized for multiple recreational purposes, and lands necessary for the preservation of coastal or historical resources. No funds derived from the bonds authorized by this division shall be expended for the construction of any reservoir designated as a part of the “State Water Facilities,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 12934 of the Water Code, but such funds may be expended
 for the acquisition or development of beaches, parks, recreational facilities, and historical resources at or in the vicinity of any such reservoir.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.197.

(a) Prior to recommending the acquisition of lands that are located on or near tidelands, submerged lands, swamp or overflowed lands, or other wetlands, whether or not such lands have been granted in trust to a local public agency, the Director of Parks and Recreation or, the Executive Officer of the State Coastal Conservancy, or the Executive Director of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, as the case may be, shall submit to the State Lands Commission any proposal by a
 state or local public agency for the acquisition of such lands pursuant to this chapter. The State Lands Commission shall, within three months of such submittal, review such proposed acquisition, make a determination as to the state’s existing or potential interest in the lands, and report its findings to the person making the submittal and to the Department of General Services.

(b) No provision of this chapter shall be construed as authorizing the condemnation of state lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Fiscal Provisions [5096.201. - 5096.213.]

5096.201.

Bonds in the total amount of two hundred eighty-five million dollars ($285,000,000), or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds shall, when sold, be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is
 hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest on the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.202.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected such a sum in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state as shall be required to pay the principal and interest on the bonds maturing each year, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.203.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this chapter, such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) Such sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal and interest on bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, as principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Such sum as is necessary to carry out the
 provisions of Section 5096.205, which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.204.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Parklands Fund of 1980, which is hereby created. The money in the fund may be expended only for the purposes specified in this chapter and only pursuant to appropriation by the Legislature in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.205.

For the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this article, the Director of Finance may by executive order authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any moneys deposited in the fund for expenditure for the purposes of subdivision (d) of Section 5096.151 shall be transferred to the State Coastal Conservancy upon appropriation by the Legislature in the manner
 provided in Section 5096.206. Any moneys deposited in the fund for expenditure for the purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 5096.151 shall be appropriated to the Department of Parks and Recreation in the manner provided in Section 5096.206. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any moneys made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund from moneys received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.2055.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any
 rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.206.

All proposed appropriations for the program shall be included in a section in the Budget Bill for the 1980–81 fiscal year and each succeeding fiscal year for consideration by the Legislature and shall bear the caption “Parklands Acquisition and Development Program.” The section shall contain separate items for each project, each class of projects, or each element of the program for which an appropriation is made.

All appropriations shall be subject to all limitations enacted in
 the Budget Act and to all fiscal procedures prescribed by law with respect to the expenditure of state funds unless expressly exempted from such laws by a statute enacted by the Legislature. Such section shall contain proposed appropriations only for the program elements and classes of projects contemplated by this chapter, and no funds derived from the bonds authorized by this chapter may be expended pursuant to an appropriation not contained in such section of the Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.207.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law are applicable to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.208.

For the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this chapter, the Parklands Program Finance Committee is hereby created. The committee consists of the Governor, the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Treasurer, and the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency. For the purposes of this chapter, the Parklands Program Finance Committee
 shall be “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law, and the State Treasurer shall serve as chair of the committee. The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency is hereby designated as “the board” for the purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 213, Sec. 9.   (AB 2768)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, and approved in Prop. 1 on Nov. 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.209.

As used in this chapter, and for the purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, “state grant” or “state grant moneys” means moneys received by the state from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter which are available for grants to counties, cities, districts, and public agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.210.

All money deposited in the fund which is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in such depositories and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.211.

Commencing with the Budget Bill for the 1990-91 fiscal year, the balance remaining in the fund may be appropriated by the Legislature for expenditure, without regard to the maximum amounts allocated to each element of the program, for any or all elements of the program specified in Section 5096.151, or any class or classes of projects within such elements, that the Legislature deems to be of the highest priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.212.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.213.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 1980, election.   Operative December 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.691. California Park and Recreational Facilities Act of 1984 [5096.225. - 5096.267.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5096.225. - 5096.229.]

5096.225.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Park and Recreational Facilities Act of 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.226.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(a) It is the responsibility of this state to provide and to encourage the provision of recreational opportunities and facilities for citizens of California. 

(b) It is the policy of the state to preserve, protect, and, where possible, restore coastal resources which are of significant recreational or environmental importance and, through proper
 planning and development, to make them available for the enjoyment of present and future generations of persons of all income levels, all ages, and all social groups.

(c) When there is proper planning and development, parks, beaches, recreation areas and recreational facilities, and historical resources preservation projects contribute not only to a healthy physical and moral environment, but also contribute to the economic betterment of the state, and, therefore, it is in the public interest for the state to acquire, develop, or restore areas for recreation, conservation, or preservation and to aid local governments of the state in acquiring, developing, or restoring those areas as will contribute to the realization of the policy declared in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.227.

The Legislature further finds and declares that:

(a) The demand for parks, beaches, recreation areas and recreational facilities, and historical resources preservation projects in California is far greater than what is presently available, with the number of people who cannot be accommodated at the area of their choice or any comparable area increasing rapidly. Further, the development of parks, beaches, recreation areas and recreational facilities, and
 historical resources preservation projects has not proceeded rapidly enough to provide for their full utilization by the public.

(b) The demand for parks, beaches, recreation areas and recreational facilities, and historical resources preservation projects in the urban areas of our state is even greater since over 90 percent of the present population of California reside in urban areas; there continues to be a serious deficiency in open space and recreation areas in the metropolitan areas of the state; and less urban land is available, costs are escalating, and competition for land is increasing.

(c) There is a high concentration of urban social problems in California’s major metropolitan areas which can be partially alleviated by increased recreational opportunities.

(d) There is a particularly high demand for
 recreational use at reservoirs and lakes within the state park system and recreational facilities at nonstate water facilities are particularly in need of expansion, rehabilitation, or restoration.

(e) California’s coast provides a great variety of recreational opportunities not found at inland sites; it is heavily used because the state’s major urban areas lie, and 85 percent of the state’s population lives, within 30 miles of the Pacific Ocean; a shortage of facilities for almost every popular coastal recreational activity exists; and there will be a continuing high demand for popular coastal activities such as fishing, swimming, sightseeing, general beach use, camping, and day use. Funding for the development of a number of key coastal sites is critical at this time, particularly in metropolitan areas where both the demand for and the deficiency of recreational facilities is greatest.

(f) Cities, counties, and districts must exercise constant vigilance to see that the parks, beaches, recreation areas and recreational facilities, and historical resources they now have are not lost to other uses; they should acquire additional lands as those lands become available; they should take steps to improve the facilities they now have; and they should adequately operate and maintain their existing and proposed systems for the enjoyment of present and future generations of persons of all income levels, all ages, and all social groups.

(g) Past and current funding programs have not and cannot meet present deficiencies. This condition has become more acute as a result of restrictions on local governmental revenues. There is a need to give priority to further recreational development that can serve expanding recreational needs, produce operating revenues, and in some cases
 stimulate private sector jobs. In view of the present revenue shortages, and the increasing recreational demands, such a priority is most important at this time.

(h) In view of the foregoing, the Legislature declares that an aggressive, coordinated, funded program for meeting existing and projected recreational demands must be implemented without delay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.228.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Coastal resources” means those land and water areas within the coastal zone, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 31006, and within the Santa Monica Mountains Zone, as described in Section 33105, which are suitable for public park, beach, or recreational purposes, including, but not limited to, areas of historical significance and areas of open space that
 complement park, beach, or recreational areas, or which are suitable for the preservation of coastal resource values.

(b) “District” means any district authorized to provide park, recreational, or open-space services, or a combination of those services, except a school district.

(c) “Fund” means the Parklands Fund of 1984.

(d) “Historical resource” includes, but is not limited to, any building, structure, site, area, or place which is historically or archaeologically significant, or is significant in the architectural, engineering, scientific, economic, agricultural, educational, social, political, military, or cultural annals of California.

(e) “Historical resources preservation project” is a project designed to preserve an historical resource which is
 either listed in the National Register of Historic Places or is registered as either a state historical landmark or point of historical interest pursuant to Section 5021.

(f) “Inland resources” means those land and water areas not included in the definition of coastal resources.

(g) “Program” means the Parklands Acquisition and Development Program of 1984 established by this chapter.

(h) “Stewardship” means the development and implementation of major programs for the protection, rehabilitation, restoration, and enhancement of the basic natural systems and outstanding scenic features of the state park system. It does not mean the maintenance or alteration of facilities, developments, or of any physical installations whose original purpose was not the protection of natural and scenic resources.

(i) “Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta” means those land and water areas defined in Section 12200 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.229.

(a) “District,” as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 5096.228, includes a district agricultural association or a citrus fruit fair which is authorized to provide park, recreational, or open-space services, or a combination of those services, of a character commonly provided by a recreation and park district, and which provides those services for the general public on a year-round basis.

(b) Park, recreational, or open-space services, or a combination of those services, of a character commonly provided by a county parks and recreation department, which are provided
 by a county fair for the general public on a year-round basis, are eligible for a local assistance grant pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5096.231 as a county project.

(c) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the provisions of this section are declaratory of and in accord with existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Parklands Acquisition and Development Program [5096.231. - 5096.232.]

5096.231.

All money deposited in the Parklands Fund of 1984 shall be available for appropriation in the manner set forth in Section 5096.260 for the purposes set forth below in amounts not to exceed the following: (a)For grants to counties, cities, and districts for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, or restoration of real property for
 park, beach, recreational, or historical resources preservation purposes, including an amount not to exceed $1,500,000 for state administrative costs directly incurred in connection therewith, and further including the amount of $1,500,000 for grants to nonprofit organizations as provided in category (5), in accordance with the following schedule: $150,000,000Schedule:(1) Seventy-eight million five hundred thousand dollars ($78,500,000) for the development, rehabilitation, or restoration of real property for park, beach, and recreational purposes; provided, however, that each county shall be entitled to receive not less than two hundred